test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ellaei4_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - elläi: # Noun (4) elläi 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     elläi+N+Sg+Nom: elläi
     elläi+N+Sg+Gen: eläjä
     elläi+N+Sg+Par: eläjät
     elläi+N+Sg+Ill: eläjähe
     elläi+N+Pl+Gen: eläjide
     elläi+N+Pl+Par: eläjit
     elläi+N+Pl+Ill: eläjihe
     elläi+N+Pl+All: eläjile

     elläi+N+Sg+Nom: elläi
     elläi+N+Sg+Gen: eläjä
     elläi+N+Sg+Par: eläjät
     elläi+N+Sg+Ill: [eläjähe, eläjäde]
     elläi+N+Sg+Ine: [eläjän, eläjäh, eläjähn]
     elläi+N+Sg+Ela: eläjäst
     elläi+N+Sg+All: eläjäle
     elläi+N+Sg+Ade: eläjäl
     elläi+N+Sg+Abl: eläjält
     elläi+N+Sg+Tra: eläjäs
     elläi+N+Sg+Ter: eläjäniq
     elläi+N+Sg+Abe: eläjäldäq
     elläi+N+Sg+Com: eläjägaq
     elläi+N+Pl+Nom: eläjäq
     elläi+N+Pl+Gen: eläjide
     elläi+N+Pl+Par: [eläjit, eläjiid]
     elläi+N+Pl+Ill: [eläjihe, eläjiihe, eläjide, eläjiide]
     elläi+N+Pl+Ine: [eläjin, eläjih, eläjihn, eläjiin, eläjiih, eläjiihn]
     elläi+N+Pl+Ela: [eläjist, eläjiist]
     elläi+N+Pl+All: [eläjile, eläjiile]
     elläi+N+Pl+Ade: [eläjil, eläjiil]
     elläi+N+Pl+Abl: [eläjilt, eläjiilt]
     elläi+N+Pl+Tra: [eläjis, eläjiis]
     elläi+N+Pl+Ter: [eläjiniq, eläjiiniq]
     elläi+N+Pl+Abe: [eläjildäq, eläjiildäq]
     elläi+N+Pl+Com: [eläjidegaq, eläjiidegaq]
